District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Department of Mental Health Establishment Amendment Act of 2001”.

History

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 101, 48 DCR 7674

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1141.02, § 7-1141.06, § 7-1141.07, § 7-1141.09, § 7-1231.02, and § 21-511.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 101 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).